Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 5

Nonemergency Involuntary Admission to Inpatient Treatment

33-6-501. “Substantial likelihood of serious harm” defined.

IF AND ONLY IF

a person has threatened or attempted suicide or to inflict serious bodily harm on the person, OR

the person has threatened or attempted homicide or other violent behavior, OR

the person has placed others in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm to them, OR

the person is unable to avoid severe impairment or injury from specific risks, AND

there is a substantial likelihood that the harm will occur unless the person is placed under involuntary treatment,

THEN

the person poses a “substantial likelihood of serious harm” for purposes of this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 6, §§ 33-6-101 — 33-6-111; 33-6-201 — 33-6-209; 33-6-301 — 33-6-306 (Acts 1957, ch. 288, §§ 1-5; impl. am. Acts 1957, ch. 127, §§ 1, 3, 4; 1963, ch. 315, §§ 1, 2; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 37-40, 43, 45, 46; 1967, ch. 44, § 1; 1967, ch. 58, § 1;1973, ch. 127, § 11; 1974, ch. 464, § 3; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 43, 45, 46, 52, 53; 1975, ch. 199, §§ 1-3; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 14, 16-18; 1976, ch. 610, § 1; 1976, ch. 763, § 5; 1976, ch. 764, §§ 2, 3; 1977, ch. 165, § 1; 1977, ch. 386, § 2; 1977, ch. 449, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 527, §§ 5, 6; 1980, ch. 621, § 1; 1981, ch. 224, §§ 25-27; 1981, ch. 445, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(21); 1981, ch. 536, § 1; 1982, ch. 862, § 1, 3-11; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 8, 9, 11, 13, 14, 17-22, 24; T.C.A., § 33-314, 33-325, 33-603, 33-601, 33-604, 33-606 — 33-609, 33-614 — 33-619; 33-379 — 33-381, 33-1301 — 33-1305, 33-3-620 — 33-3-622, 33-6-203 — 33-6-205; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 8, 11-16, 23-25, 27, 28-32, 39, 40; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 14-25; 1985, ch. 478, § 37; Acts 1986, ch. 595, §§ 1, 2; 1986, ch. 836, §§ 4, 6; 1987, ch. 145, § 26; 1988, ch. 862, §§ 1-5; 1988, ch 953, § 8; 1989, ch. 99, § 1; 1989, ch. 311, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 3, 15-17; 1990, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 893, §§ 1, 2; 1992, ch. 991, §§ 15, 16; 1993, ch. 356, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 376, §§ 1-4; 1994, ch. 676, § 1; 1994, ch. 779, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 57-66; 2000, ch. 947, § 6), is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of communications between psychiatrist and patient, § 24-1-207.

Definitions applicable to title generally, § 33-1-101.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 12.55, 14.10.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501.

Law Reviews.

Barriers to Providing Effective Treatment: A Critique of Revisions in Procedural, Substantive, and Dispositional Criteria in Involuntary Civil Commitment (Donald H.J. Hermann), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 83 (1986).

Civil Commitment in Tennessee — What Process is Due? (W. Russell Stambaugh), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 135 (1978).

Criminal Law in Tennessee in 1977-1978, III. Defenses (Joseph G. Cook), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 490 (1979).

Insane Persons — Commitment Proceedings — Requirement of Reasonable Notice, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 113 (1952).

Reducing Unintended Ambiguity in Statutes: An Introduction to Normalization of Statutory Drafting (Grayfred B. Gray), 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 433 (1987).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Fees and costs in indigent proceedings, OAG 85-021, 1985 Tenn. AG LEXIS 274 (1/29/85).

Due process, OAG 86-23, 1986 Tenn. AG LEXIS 199 (1/31/86).

Collateral References.

Admissibility on issue of sanity of expert opinion based partly on medical, psychological or hospital reports. 55 A.L.R.3d 551.

Amnesiac party as entitled to presumption of due care. 88 A.L.R.3d 622.

Liability for false imprisonment predicated upon institution of, or conduct in connection with, insanity proceedings. 30 A.L.R.3d 523.

Liability for malicious prosecution predicated upon institution of, or conduct in connection with, insanity proceedings. 30 A.L.R.3d 455.

Right to counsel in insanity or incompetency adjudication proceedings. 87 A.L.R.2d 950.

When finding or adjudication as to one's mental condition by official or body not clearly judicial is conclusive evidence or has effect of a judgment as regards legal mental status. 108 A.L.R. 47.

33-6-502. Prerequisites to judicial commitment for involuntary care and treatment.

IF AND ONLY IF

a person has a mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, AND

the person poses a substantial likelihood of serious harm because of the mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, AND

the person needs care, training, or treatment because of the mental illness or serious emotional disturbance, AND

all available less drastic alternatives to placement in a hospital or treatment resource are unsuitable to meet the needs of the person,

THEN

the person may be judicially committed to involuntary care and treatment in a hospital or treatment resource in proceedings conducted in conformity with chapter 3, part 6 of this title.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Law Reviews.

One Fell Through the Cracks: Why Tennessee Needs an Initial Outpatient Commitment Statute (Lori R. Holyfield), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 221 (2011).

33-6-503. Two (2) certificates of need required — Defendants under sixteen (16) years of age.

No defendant may be judicially committed under this part, unless two (2) licensed physicians, or one (1) licensed physician and one (1) licensed psychologist qualified as provided in § 33-6-427(a), file in the commitment proceeding certificates of need for care and treatment certifying that the defendant satisfies the requirements of § 33-6-502(1)-(4) and showing the factual foundation for the conclusions on each item. No defendant who is a child under sixteen (16) years of age may be judicially committed under this part unless one (1) of the certificates is by a physician or psychologist with experience with children.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2004, ch. 565, § 8.

33-6-504. Persons who may file complaint for commitment under this part.

The parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse, or a responsible relative of the person alleged to be in need of care and treatment, a licensed physician, a licensed psychologist who meets the requirements of § 33-6-427(a), a health or public welfare officer, an officer authorized to make arrests in the state, or the chief officer of a facility that the person is in, may file a complaint to require involuntary care and treatment of a person with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance under this part.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2004, ch. 565, § 8.

33-6-505. Commitment to state facility.

If the court commits a person under this section, the person comes into the commissioner's custody only if the state-owned or operated facility or treatment resource has available suitable accommodations; provided, that, if there are no suitable available accommodations at the time of the determination, then the commissioner shall expeditiously find a state-owned or operated hospital or treatment resource to accommodate the person upon the availability of suitable available accommodations. Prior to transporting a person for such commitment, the sheriff or other transportation agent shall determine that the receiving state-owned or operated facility or treatment resource has available suitable accommodations.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1; 2009, ch. 531, § 42.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

33-6-506. Commitment to other public or private facility.

If a licensed public hospital or treatment resource other than a state facility has available suitable accommodations, the court may commit the defendant to the public hospital or treatment resource.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-507. Commitment to contract facility — Conformance with contract.

If a licensed private or local public hospital or treatment resource has contracted with the department to serve defendants in the region and has available suitable accommodations, the court shall commit the defendant to the facility, and the facility shall admit and detain the defendant in conformity with its obligations under its contract with the department.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-508. Commitment to non-state facility where third-party payment has been arranged.

IF

a parent, legal guardian, legal custodian, conservator, spouse, or an adult relative of the defendant, or any other person has made arrangements to pay the cost of care and treatment in a licensed private hospital or treatment resources, OR

the facility chooses to accept the defendant when no third person has made arrangements to pay the cost, AND

placement in the facility is more appropriate to the needs of the defendant than placement in a state facility,

THEN

the court may commit the defendant to the facility.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-509. Suitable accommodations required.

The chief officer of a facility to which a person is committed under this part shall not admit the person until the facility has available suitable accommodations. If a person is committed to a state facility under this part, the person does not come into the custody of the commissioner until the facility has available suitable accommodations.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-6-510. Person eligible for care as armed forces veteran.

If a person ordered to be hospitalized under this part is eligible for hospital care or treatment by the veterans' administration of the United States within this state, the court, upon receipt of a certificate from the veterans' administration showing that facilities are available and that the person is eligible for care or treatment there, may order the person to be placed in the custody of the agency for hospitalization within this state. With respect to those persons the appropriate provisions of § 34-5-118, being a part of the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Law, shall apply.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 43; T.C.A., §§ 33-606, 33-6-105; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Law, referred to in this section, is compiled in title 34, ch. 5.